Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Maximizing Supplemental  Nutrition Assistance Pro-
gram Benefits is established.
(2) The task force consists of members appointed by the  Director of Human Services who
represent the geographic and racial or ethnic diversity of this state and who have:
(a) Expertise in food insecurity.
(b) Personal experience receiving Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.
(c) Experience in the restaurant industry.
(d) Experience in the retail grocery industry.
(e) Personal or professional experience in working with Oregonians who experience bar-
riers to accessing hot food, such  as seniors, individuals with disabilities or homeless indi-
viduals.
(3) The task force shall analyze options available under any applicable federal  waivers or
federal programs under 7 U.S.C. 2026, or other options available with federal approval, to
maximize the  food choices for recipients of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits, including by allowing benefits to be used to purchase hot foods and hot foods  that
are ready for immediate consumption.
(4) The Department of Human Services shall provide staff support to the task force.
(5) Based on  the analysis of the task force, the Department of Human Services shall de-
velop a plan to implement a program to allow recipients to use  Supplemental Nutrition As-
sistance Program benefits to purchase hot foods and hot foods  that are ready for immediate
consumption, including restaurant  meals, and shall pursue federal approval from the United
States Department of Agriculture, if approval is needed, or pursue options currently avail-
able under federal law to implement the program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1585 (SB 1585-B) Page 1
(6) The plan for the program as described  in subsection (5) of this section must include,
but is not limited to, recommendations for an evaluation of the program to examine:
(a) Access to the program;
(b) The efficacy of the program in allowing participants to obtain restaurant meals; and
(c) The cost of the program.
(7) A majority of the members of the  task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(8) Official  action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(9) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(10) If there is a vacancy for any  cause, the director shall make an appointment to be-
come immediately effective.
(11) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(12) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(13) No later than January 31,  2025, the task force shall submit a report on the imple-
mentation of the program, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human services.
(14) Members of the task force are entitled to compensation and to reimbursement  for
actual and necessary  travel and other expenses the members incur in the performance of
their duties on the task force in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(16) The department shall solicit public feedback on the  plan developed under subsection
(5) of this section to ensure that the department receives feedback from  an equity perspec-
tive before implementing the program.
(17) The department may implement the program on a  statewide basis or initially as a
pilot program.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1 of this 2024 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  [ (1) The Task Force on Maximizing Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program Benefits
is established. ]
[(2) The task force consists of members appointed by  the Director of Human Services who represent
the geographic and racial or ethnic diversity of this state and who have: ]
[(a) Expertise in food insecurity. ]
[(b) Personal experience receiving Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits. ]
[(c) Experience in the restaurant industry. ]
[(d) Experience in the retail grocery industry. ]
[(e) Personal or professional experience in working with Oregonians who experience barriers to
accessing hot food, such as seniors, individuals with disabilities or homeless individuals. ]
[(3) The task force shall analyze options available under any applicable  federal waivers or federal
programs under 7 U.S.C. 2026, or other options available  with federal approval, to maximize the food
choices for recipients of  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, including by allowing
benefits to be used to purchase hot foods and hot foods that are ready for immediate consumption. ]
[(4) The Department of Human Services shall provide staff support to the task force. ]
[(5) Based  on the analysis of the task force, the Department of Human Services shall develop a plan
to implement a program to  allow recipients to use Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits
to purchase hot foods and hot foods that are ready for immediate  consumption, including restaurant
meals, and shall pursue federal approval from  the United States Department of Agriculture, if approval
is needed, or pursue options currently available under federal law to implement the program. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1585 (SB 1585-B) Page 2
[(6) The plan  for the program as described in subsection (5) of this section must include, but is not
limited to, recommendations for an evaluation of the program to examine: ]
[(a) Access to the program; ]
[(b) The efficacy of the program in allowing participants to obtain restaurant meals; and ]
[(c) The cost of the program. ]
[(7) A  majority of the members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction of busi-
ness.]
[(8) Official action by the task force requires  the approval of a majority of the members of the task
force.]
[(9) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson. ]
[(10) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the director shall make an  appointment to become imme-
diately effective. ]
[(11) The task force shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or of a
majority of the members of the task force. ]
[(12) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force. ]
[(13) No later than January 31,  2025, the task force shall submit a report on the implementation
of the program, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the  interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to human services. ]
[(14) Members of the task  force are entitled to compensation and to reimbursement for actual and
necessary travel and other expenses the members incur in the performance of their duties on the task
force in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. ]
[(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111,  are directed to assist the task
force in the performance of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted by  laws relating to
confidentiality, to furnish  information and advice the members of the task force consider necessary to
perform their duties. ]
[(16) The department shall solicit public  feedback on the plan developed under subsection (5) of this
section to ensure that the department receives feedback from an equity perspective before  implementing
the program. ]
[(17) The department  may implement the program on a statewide basis or initially as a pilot pro-
gram.]
To the extent permitted  by federal law, the Department of Human Services shall allow
recipients of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance  Program benefits who lack access to kitchen
facilities or a means of preparing meals to use the benefits to purchase  hot foods and hot
foods that are ready for immediate consumption, including restaurant meals.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to section 1 of this 2024 Act by section 2 of this 2024 Act
become operative one year after receipt of  any approval that is necessary to carry out the
plan for implementing the program described in section 1 of this  2024 Act or one year after
the notification from the  United States Secretary of Agriculture that no federal approval is
necessary.
SECTION 4. The Department of Human Services shall notify the Legislative Counsel im-
mediately upon receipt of:
(1) Any federal approval described in section 3 of this 2024 Act or the denial of  approval;
or
(2) Notification from the United States Secretary of  Agriculture that no approval is
necessary.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by  $481,371
for carrying out section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,
Enrolled Senate Bill 1585 (SB 1585-B) Page 3
but excluding federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, col-
lected or received  by the Department of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is
increased by $698,970 for carrying out section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1585 (SB 1585-B) Page 4